Illinois, session 104th, SB2698.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Article XLVIII as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)7ARTICLE XLVIII. RATES 8    (215 ILCS 5/1801 new)9    Sec. 1801. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 10Insurance Rate Fairness and Consumer Protection Law. 11    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)12    Sec. 1805. Purpose. The purpose of this Law is to limit 13unjustified increases in homeowners and automobile insurance 14premiums, ensure transparency in rate-setting practices, and 15grant the Department of Insurance greater oversight authority 16to protect consumers. 17    (215 ILCS 5/1810 new)18    Sec. 1810. Definitions. As used in this Law:19    "Department" means the Department of Insurance.20    "Director" means the Director of Insurance.  SB2698- 2 -LRB104 15445 BAB 28601 b1    "Insurer" means an insurance company offering homeowners 2insurance policies or automobile insurance policies within the 3State. 4    (215 ILCS 5/1815 new)5    Sec. 1815. Prior approval requirement for rate changes.6    (a) This Section is operative on and after January 1, 72028. 8    (b) Insurers must submit a request for approval to the 9Department for any proposed rate increase for homeowners 10insurance premiums or automobile insurance premiums.11    (c) The Department shall review the rate request within 60 12days after submission.13    (d) If the Department does not make a determination within 14the 60-day review period, the request shall be deemed denied 15until further review.16    (e) Insurers shall not implement any rate increase without 17prior written approval from the Department. 18    (215 ILCS 5/1830 new)19    Sec. 1830. Rate increase limitations. 20    (a) No insurer shall increase premiums by more than 10% 21per year for any policyholder without exceptional 22justification.23    (b) Exceptional justification must include evidence of 24increased claims related to natural disasters, regulatory   SB2698- 3 -LRB104 15445 BAB 28601 b1changes, or unforeseen market shifts.2    (c) The Department shall have sole discretion to determine 3whether the exceptional justification is valid. 4    (215 ILCS 5/1835 new)5    Sec. 1835. Regular market conduct examinations. 6    (a) The Department shall conduct market conduct 7examinations of insurers at least once every 3 years to ensure 8compliance with this Law.9    (b) Examinations shall assess the fairness of rate-setting 10practices, transparency of filings, and adherence to approved 11rates.12    (c) The Department may issue corrective actions, fines, or 13sanctions for violations discovered during market conduct 14examinations. 15    (215 ILCS 5/1840 new)16    Sec. 1840. Penalties and enforcement. 17    (a) Any insurer that submits false or misleading 18information in a rate request pursuant to Section 1815 shall 19be subject to a penalty of $100,000 per offense.20    (b) Any insurer that implements unapproved rate increases 21or fails to comply with this Law shall be subject to penalties 22of up to $250,000 per violation.23    (c) Any insurer found in repeated noncompliance of this 24Law shall be penalized $1,000,000, and the Department may   SB2698- 4 -LRB104 15445 BAB 28601 b1suspend the insurer's license to operate for up to 12 months. 2If an insurer's license to operate was suspended under this 3subsection and the insurer continues to violate the provisions 4of this Law, regardless of whether the violation occurs after 5the insurer's license has been restored, the Department may 6permanently revoke the insurer's license to operate.7    (d) Policyholders affected by unapproved rate increases 8shall be entitled to reimbursement by the insurer of any 9overpaid premiums plus an additional penalty in an amount 10equal to 30% of the amount of the overpaid premiums. 11    (215 ILCS 5/1845 new)12    Sec. 1845. Rulemaking authority. The Department may adopt 13rules necessary to implement and enforce the requirements of 14this Law. 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 161, 2028.